Utah statutes.
20A-5-301.   Combined voting precincts -- Municipalities.

(1) (a)  The municipal legislative body of a city of the first or second class may combine up to four regular county voting precincts into one municipal voting precinct for purposes of a municipal election if they designate the location and address of each of those combined voting precincts.

(b)  The polling place shall be within the combined voting precinct or within 1/2 mile of the boundaries of the voting precinct.

(2) (a)  The municipal legislative body of a city of the third, fourth, or fifth class or town may combine two or more regular county voting precincts into one municipal voting precinct for purposes of an election if it designates the location and address of that combined voting precinct.

(b)  If only two precincts are combined, the polling place shall be within the combined precinct or within 1/2 mile of the boundaries of the combined voting precinct.

(c)  If more than two precincts are combined, the polling place should be as near as practical to the middle of the combined precinct.



Amended by Chapter 256, 2007 General Session

